apertium-hun.hun.dix
    <pardef n="lát__vblex">
        <e><p><l>ni</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ok</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>sz</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>unk</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>tok</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nak</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>om</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="def"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>od</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="def"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ja</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="def"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>jik</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="def"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>átok</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="def"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ák</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="def"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>tam</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>tál</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ott</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>tunk</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>tatok</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>tak</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>talak</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="def"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>tad</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="def"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ta</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="def"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>tuk</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="def"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>tátok</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="def"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ták</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="def"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        </pardef>

    <!-- regular e1 ö ü -->
    <pardef n="szeret__vblex">

        <e><p><l>ni</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ek</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>sz</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ünk</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>tek</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nek</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        
        <e><p><l>em</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="def"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ed</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="def"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>i</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="def"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>jük</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="def"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>itek</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="def"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ik</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="def"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>te</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="def"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- asz -->
    <pardef n="tart__vblex">
        <e><p><l>ani</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ok</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>asz</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>unk</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>otok</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>anak</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>om</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="def"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>od</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="def"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ja</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="def"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>juk</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="def"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>játok</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="def"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ják</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="def"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>d</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subj"/><s n="def"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        
        <e><p><l>hatom</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pot"/><s n="px1ss"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ózik</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="foo"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- regular ik -->
    <pardef n="játsz/ik__vblex">
        <e><p><l>ani</l><r>ik<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
        
        <e><p><l>ok</l><r>ik<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ol</l><r>ik<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ik</l><r>ik<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>unk</l><r>ik<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>otok</l><r>ik<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>anak</l><r>ik<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>hattak</l><r>ik<s n="vblex"/><s n="mod"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="e/szik__vblex">
        <e><p><l>nni</l><r>szik<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>szek</l><r>szik<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>szel</l><r>szik<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>szik</l><r>szik<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>szünk</l><r>szik<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>tek</l><r>szik<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nek</l><r>szik<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="i/szik__vblex">
        <e><p><l>nni</l><r>szik<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>szok</l><r>szik<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>szol</l><r>szik<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>szik</l><r>szik<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>szunk</l><r>szik<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>tok</l><r>szik<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nak</l><r>szik<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    

    <e lm="alszik"><i>alsz</i><par n="játsz/ik__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="befejezés"><i>befejez</i><par n="szeret__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bújik"><i>búj</i><par n="játsz/ik__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="elbújik"><i>elbúj</i><par n="játsz/ik__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="eszik"><i>e</i><par n="e/szik__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hall"><i>hall</i><par n="tart__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hallgat"><i>hallgat</i><par n="tart__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="iszik"><i>i</i><par n="i/szik__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="játszik"><i>játsz</i><par n="játsz/ik__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="lát"><i>lát</i><par n="lát__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="megmond"><i>megmond</i><par n="tart__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mond"><i>mond</i><par n="tart__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="szeret"><i>szeret</i><par n="szeret__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tart"><i>tart</i><par n="tart__vblex"/></e>
